Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
Number of Reviews
26

Author
Steve Rhodes
Entertaining balderdash, RULES OF ENGAGEMENT, by director William
Friedkin (THE FRENCH CONNECTION and TO LIVE AND DIE IN L.A.), is the
best bad movie this year.  (Okay, I admit it, the year is still young.)
With a jingoistic plot that's borderline parody, the movie is likely to
elicit unintentional laughter from its audiences.  Still, no matter how
ridiculous Stephen Gaghan's script becomes, the director keeps the
action fast-paced enough that it keeps you involved in the intrigue.
Among the movie's long laundry list of problems is the miscasting of
some of the key leads.  Guy Pearce comes across way too slimy as the
prosecutor, and Tommy Lee Jones should never have been chosen to play a
quiet, sympathetic loser -- an alcoholic who lacks confidence in
himself.  If you pay the big bucks for Jones, don't rein him in with
such a constraining part.
But, the picture remains as riveting as it is infuriating.  Characters
make stupid mistakes, usually for no discernable reasons.  Nevertheless,
Friedkin manages to make an interesting movie.  It's a film that will
engross you while you're there but will fall apart in your mind as you
begin to think about it later.
James Webb's story concerns a rescue mission gone bad.  When the
American Embassy in Yemen is attacked, three helicopters of American
Marines are sent in under the command of Colonel Terry L. Childers
(Samuel L. Jackson).  When the troops arrive, they find the Ambassador
(Ben Kingsley) and his wife (Anne Archer) frightened out of their minds.
With conspicuous bravery and courage, Col. Childers saves the family and
his country's flag.
Up until this point in the picture, the tension is palpable.  When the
helicopters are shown on their way in, your adrenaline will pump right
along with that of the young troops.
After losing three of his men and with others wounded, Col. Childers
decides that they must return fire.  Believing that he sees the gunfire
coming from the crowd, he orders his troops to fire on the men, women
and children.  The net result of this is that the other side stops
firing, but it creates an international incident since almost a hundred
people die.  When the Yemens clear the courtyard they claim to have
found no weapons whatsoever.  They say that the crowd was peaceful and
that the Marines should have fired only on the rooftop snipers.
After an unshown investigation, Col. Childers is ordered to be
court-martialed.  In another of the story's illogical aspects, he is
given only eight days after he is charged before his trial begins.
Apparently he hasn't been taking the case very seriously since he hasn't
even retained a lawyer.  When forced to find one, he goes for a friend.
For his attorney, Col. Childers turns to his old buddy from Vietnam,
Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), a recently retired soldier.
Col. Hodges, who graduated 67th in his law school class has lost as many
cases as he has won, so the prosecution is elated by the choice.  "I'm a
good enough lawyer to know that you need a better lawyer than me," Col.
Hodges warns his old buddy, who dismisses the advice.
Bruce Greenwood plays William Sokal, a duplicitous National Security
Advisor who destroys evidence and intimidates a witness in order to
ensure that Col. Childers is made the scapegoat that the government
needs.  Like so many of the other characters in this hackneyed script,
you've seen someone like Sokal in a hundred other movies.
There is a scene just after the verdict is rendered that will have
everyone in the audience thinking, "no way!"  To be fair, though, the
movie is almost as much fun as it is ludicrous. Almost.
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT runs 2:07.  It is rated R for war violence and
language and would be acceptable for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
John Beachem
Directed by: William Friedkin
Written by: James Webb (story), Stephen Gaghan
"Rules of Engagement", the new film from William Friedkin (you remember, the
guy who directed "The Exorcist" way back when), is something of an enigma.
It's one of those films which is entirely predictable, not particularly well
written, and it's all stuff we've seen before. However, there is something
about it that holds your attention despite all of this. I suppose it could
be the two leads, Tommy Lee Jones and Samuel L. Jackson, two of the better
actors working in Hollywood today. It could also be that Friedkin somehow
manages to keep the action going throughout the entire film so that you're
never distracted by having seen all this before. Whatever the reason, "Rules
of Engagement" is one of those bizarre movies like "The 13th Warrior" which
has no discernible redeeming qualities, but I was incapable of disliking.
Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) is a decorated marine and Vietnam
veteran. His latest assignment is to fly into Yemen with a squad of marines
and rescue an ambassador (Ben Kingsley) and his family from protestors at
the American embassy. When the protestors turn violent and marines are
killed, Childers orders his men to open fire on the crowd, killing over 70
people. Now he faces a court martial and up to fifteen years in prison
unless he can prove that the crowd had weapons, and he was only returning
fire. His attorney is Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), a friend whose
life Childers saved in Vietnam. The prosecuting attorney is the slimy Major
Mark Biggs (Guy Pearce), who has been hired on by the even slimier William
Sokal (Bruce Greenwood), who wants everything pinned on Childers so the US
can save face.
As I said, this is hardly an original movie since obvious similarities to
1992's "A Few Good Men" exist. There are several things besides the lack of
originality which really hurt this film. One is the absence of a good score.
In fact, there is hardly any music at all in "Rules of Engagement". During
the courtroom and battle scenes, where the tension is palpable and the
audience is on the edge of their seats, a nice dramatic score would have
been welcome. Instead, we are given overwhelmingly loud sound effects of
explosions and gun shots which make it impossible to hear what is being
said. On the bright side, the battle scenes are very realistically filmed,
especially the opening scene of the skirmish in Vietnam involving Childers
and Hodges' unit and a VC squad.
The acting in "Rules of Engagement" is certainly the film's high point.
Samuel L. Jackson is the perfect choice for his role. A man consumed with
passion (Jackson is at his best when playing a character consumed by
passion) for his job and his country. Jones may be a bit miscast as an
alcoholic loser of a lawyer, but he turns in a great performance anyway. Ben
Kingsley ("Species", "What Planet Are You From?") is given nothing to do
other than look shifty eyed and stutter over his testimony in court. Guy
Pearce, who gave a brilliant performance in "LA Confidential", is horribly
miscast as the prosecuting attorney. There is something about Pearce's
performance that makes Major Biggs seem incredibly slimy (too much so in
fact) despite the fact that his introduction sets the character up as
something of a boy scout.
There are certain things about this film which make very little sense. For
example, Bruce Greenwood's ("Double Jeopardy") character is given a video
tape that would not only clear Childers of all charges, but would get the US
out of trouble as well. Instead of submitting the tape as evidence, he tells
his aid: "I don't want to think about it, I don't want to see it, I don't
want it to exist." Not only does it not make sense that he didn't want it to
exist, but it makes even less sense that he would tell a witness. The only
other thing that bothered me was the poor editing job performed here. Not
only are long, sometimes boring sequences not edited down to size, but we
are sometimes given quick camera cuts from person to person during the
courtroom scenes which make things very confusing. "Rules of Engagement"
runs a little too long at 127 minutes. I recommend it to fans of Tommy Lee
Jones and Samuel L Jackson since they are both given a chance to shine here.
I give the film two and a half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick. Try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you have nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Lars Lindahl
Review by Lars Lindahl (larsattacks@mail.com)
Starring Samuel L. Jackson,Tommy Lee Jones, Bruce
Greenwood, Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Anne Archer,
Blair Underwood, and Philip Baker Hall. 
The military courtroom drama called Rules of
Engagement is missing something crucial from its
story: an ending. The film just stops out of nowhere,
crushing the little excitement it had built up in its
previous hour and a half. It felt like the filmmakers
ran out of film and were forced to release whatever
they had taped. The script just contained an
expedient, lazy finish. The poor ending was upsetting
because I sat through the monotonous first three
quarters of the movie hoping for a thrilling,
unpredictable conclusion. All that was given were some
words on the screen explaining what eventually
happened to each of the main characters' lives.
Warning: don't expect a grand finale. 
Featuring an all star cast, the movie has an
interesting premise. When anarchy erupts in the Middle
Eastern country of Yemen, a group of marines led by
Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) rush to the
scene in order to evacuate the embassy containing the
ambassador (Ben Kingsley) and his family. At the heat
of the moment, things get out of hand when three
marines are shot down. The question is who shot them?
Childers thinking it was citizens with guns protesting
below, orders his men to fire at the civilians. The
marines kill eighty three civilians and when no guns
are found on the civilians, America is forced to
explain what happened. In order to make it seem like
America was not to blame, top officials (including
Bruce Greenwood, doing his usual role) frame and
prosecute Childers saying he made an incorrect order.
When evidence is destroyed and witnesses hushed, it is
an innocent Childers against the government. Only
Colonel Hays Hodges (well acted by Tommy Lee Jones), a
Vietnam pal of Childers and retired lawyer doing one
more case, can defend Childers and prove to the jury
that he is innocent.
Rules of Engagement is an ok movie. I didn't feel sick
once it was over but I didn't feel like celebrating
either. For a film that brags about its intensity,
there was not much present besides the chaotic, loud,
and ultimately exciting scene which the trial revolves
around. The courtroom scenes in which the characters
cursed and screamed at each other were nothing new or
edge-of-your-seat.  Every member of the cast had done
something like this before; Samuel L. Jackson does
this type of movie every year (think A Time to Kill
meets The Negotiator), and Tommy Lee Jones and Bruce
Greenwood played rivals in Double Jeopardy just last
year. The organization of the film may have hurt the
excitement level expected from moviegoers. With the
incident in Yemen occurring during the first half hour
of the film, the rest of the movie seemed very dull
and bland in comparison. 
The little things in Rules of Engagement distracted me
more than the plot holes and boring speeches. Guy
Pearce's ridiculous overacting as the prosecuting
lawyer is a prime example of the little things hurting
the overall picture. Another distraction is a
pointless scene in which Childers and Hodges bond
together by beating each other up until blood shows,
Fight Club style. Worse than that, Childers now has an
annoying black eye for the rest of the movie which
caught my attention more than his speeches declaring
innocence. Another mistake is the disappearance of
some of the actors halfway through the movie. The
ambassador and his wife (Anne Archer) as well as a
marine who was skeptical of Childers decision (Blair
Underwood), although they are very important
characters, appear very briefly in the film just
adding the feeling like the movie wasn't really
finished when the producers released it. 
Rules of Engagement is something you've seen before
except without an ending. That is the best way to
describe it.

Author
Chuck Schwartz
IN SHORT: Jackson and Jones starpower saves a lackluster script.
We begin with a mob of Arab natives cursing at, throwing rocks and
shooting rifles at, the American Embassy in Yemen. A team of Marines is
sent in to reinforce the security at the Embassy and, depending on how
bad the situation gets, safely evacuate the personnel if necessary.
Ambassador Mourain (Ben Kingsley), by the time 32 year veteran Colonel
Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) gets there, is hiding under his desk.
His wife (Anne Archer) and child are terrified. Colonel Childers does
his job, evacuates the embassy and sees three of his men die from sniper
fire and gunshots from the crowd. Having been fired upon, he orders
return fire, and 83 people are killed. The world's press (that includes
domestic) are outraged! National Security Advisor William Sokal (Bruce
Greenwood) decides that not prosecuting the Colonel would be akin to a
cover-up, and orders the Corps to put the vet out to hang. This, despite
the fact that the NSA is in possession of a videotape from the Embassy
security system, clearly showing women and children in the crowd firing
upon the Embassy.
Gee whillickers, ladies and gents! A movie with something to piss off
both Conservatives ("dee-FENSE! dee-FENSE") and whiny Liberals
("government conspiracy!") . . . and there's more blatant manipulative
stuff in what passes for a script based upon a story by former Secretary
of the Navy James Webb, but I'll leave that be. You'll catch it
immediately. Director William Friedkin trowels it on top of a pair of
combat sequences (one in Vietnam, the other the riot in Yemen) which set
up everything that scriptwriter Stephen Gaghan decides not to bother
with.
With eight day to muster up a defense, one colonel calls on another,
Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) whom he had saved in Vietnam and who has
lived out his days in the corps as a self-admitted bad lawyer. Simply
put, Good Soldier. Self-admitted Bad Lawyer. Evil Government Stooge
withholding evidence. Do I believe any of it?
Hell no. 'cuz we all have that little switch inside our heads that can
lock out everything that would piss us off 'cuz the star performances
are so much damned fun to watch. Sure, it would be nice if we got to see
a little more background on both men -- everything we need to know is
found in expository dialog. And it would have been nice if the film
didn't offer up a nod to Fight Club as a way of showing the deep
friendship between these men. We know from their previous screen
characters that Samuel L. Jackson plays the man against the system very
well, just as we know that Tommy Lee Jones is Crankier than I. Both of
'em generate such electricity on the screen (and we're talking the
inevitable trial that ends the movie. We've already pointed out that
major character development in their parts just doesn't exist) that
Rules of Engagement is a fun flick to watch.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Rules of Engagement, he would have
paid...
Absolute Star Power rules in this one. There's so little story
development here that, with lesser actors, Rules of Engagement would've
gone down in flames. There was a Gulf War vet sitting behind me -- who
wouldn't keep his mouth shut as he commented on the military sequences
-- who called the whole thing "stupid" when the final credits rolled.
But did he "hate the flick," I asked? Hell no.
Simply, buy the big popcorn and check your logic circuits at the door.
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Author
Mac VerStandig
---This review can be found at
http://www.moviereviews.org/rules_of_engagement1.htm --
Fast paced, decidedly lowbrow and gory enough to ensure an `R' rating, Rules
of Engagement is the most recent installment in Hollywood's oldest and most
classic genre: The Popcorn Flick. The acting is good, plot holes many and
concession stand just down the hall.
Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel Jackson) and Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee
Jones) served together in Vietnam where Childers saved Hodges' life. 28
years later, Childers has been through Beirut and Desert Storm while Hodges
has been through Georgetown Law. Before they both retire from the United
States Marine Corps, there is one last war to be fought.
While on a mission in Yemen to save the US Ambassador and his family from
hostile Islamic Fundamentalists protesting outside the embassy, Childers
witnesses the death of three of his marines as the armed crowd fires at his
squad. Following the rules of engagement and recognizing that an armed
civilian is no longer a civilian, Childers orders his men to open fire on
the rowdy protesters. Soon 89 Yemenis are dead and over a hundred others
injured. But for Childers, his mission has been accomplished: he rescued the
ambassador, saved as many of his men as possible and defused a unruly
situation through the necessary means (needless to say, the movie has some
issues establishing him as the genuine good-guy that he is supposed to be).
Imagine his surprise when he returns to the United States to learn that the
National Security Advisor is leading a political cover up and has decided
that a) the massacred crowd was unarmed (not many people have to be hushed
for such an allusion to be created) and b) Childers should stand murder
charges for shooting unarmed civilians.
Hodges owes his life to Childers and he will now have an opportunity to
repay that enormous debt in front of a court marshal. But first he will have
to convince himself that he is a worthy attorney, resolve a long-standing
yet unspoken conflict with his decorated father (there's a new one!) and
stop drinking (Tommy Lee Jones as a struggling alcoholic - who would have
thought?).
The movie's opening scene, set in the unruly jungles of Vietnam, is among
the more graphic that can be found in a primarily non-war film. But this is
necessary as the Childers character is established via the Asian war. And
although the gore might be more than what one wishes to see in a Hollywood
film, give credit for such reality to Platoon and Saving Private Ryan's Dale
Dye, the film's military technical adviser, who served 20 years in the
Marines (some of which were spent in that Vietnamese setting) before taking
to the more glamorous life that Hollywood provides.
Islamic supporters will likely be just as outraged at this film as they were
at 1998's The Siege, a movie they elected to picket nationwide. A critical
scene has Islamic propaganda spewing anti-Western sentiments, just an
example of the general stereotyping that paints the faith as being based on
terrorism. Even Islamic women and children are made to look bad at times.
Tommy Lee Jones and Samuel L. Jackson certainly don't wander into any new
territory with their roles here. Jones just had a similar part in last year'
s Double Jeopardy and Jackson gives an encore of his performance from The
Negotiator. Together, they make yet another excellent semi-action/semi-drama
duo that will likely go largely unnoticed come awards season (past examples
include John Travolta and Nicholas Cage for Face/Off, Samuel L. Jackson and
Kevin Spacey for The Negotiator and numerous James Bond good-guy/bad-guy
duos).
Unfortunately, some plot holes are far greater than those normally pardoned
in action films. A key witness is never called even though he is never
hushed, some simple trajectory tests that could end the trial are never
bothered with and a man standing trial for murder is never put behind bars
for reasons not clearly explained. Also, the film uses a cheap out-technique
when displaying white cards at the end to tie up some loose ends that would
have well been worth another 30 minutes. With the exception of documentaries
and films that have a smoother ending than this one, such cards should never
be needed.
Well, Hollywood's oldest institution has grown over time. Concession stands
no longer offer a genuine butter topping and you are naturally on the
edge-of-your seat during a film because the seats are too small in which to
sit back. Still, Rules of Engagement fits the modern requirements rather
well - plenty of action, court room suspense, good acting, a few errors and
a predictable ending - and you will be hard pressed to find better kernels
popping elsewhere.

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Anne
Archer, Blair Underwood, Dale Dye, Philip Baker Hall 
Written by: James Webb and Stephen Gaghan 
Directed by: William Friedkin 
Running Time: 127 minutes 
So, William Friedkin CAN make a good movie... but just barely.  Rules of
Engagement is the latest courtroom movie to hit theaters, with it's
origins owed to 1992's A Few Good Men.  Samuel L. Jackson stars as
decorated United States Marine Colonel Terry L. Childers.  While on a
rescue mission in the Middle East and under heavy enemy fire, Childers
orders his men to open fire into a crowd of demonstrators.  In the end
83 people are dead, and Childers is court-martialed for murder. 
Tommy Lee Jones plays Colonel Hayes Hodges, a retired Marine attorney
who owes his life to Childers.  Childers comes to Hodges to defend him
in his trial, and despite Hodges attempts to pursuade him otherwise he
agrees to do so.  Hodges is unsure however if he's good enough to save
his friend from a lifetime in jail. 
Female moviegoers beware, this film is heavy on the male "macho"
factor.  There's so much testosterone flowing in this movie in fact that
halfway through the two lead characters have no choice but to beat the
hell out of each other for about five minutes. 
Australian Guy Pearce plays Major Mark Biggs, the prosecutor in the case
and a pivotal character of the film.  However, Pearce's performance
almost ruins many of the scenes he's in and lessens the film's dramatic
tension.  You see, he plays his character with a strong New York accent,
one which seemed so silly that it got me laughing on several occasions. 
As I hinted at earlier, director Friedkin basically lucked out here and
emerged with a entertaining flick.  It's slow in spots, a little too
long, and the story unfolds in such a matter of fact manner that it's
hard to really get behind the film.  You know exactly where it's going,
and the audience is basically just waiting to get there.  Even the final
outcome of the trial seems unimportant, as it's brushed off with a quick
joke. 
If Friedkin had edited the film differently I think it could have been
tremendously more entertaining.  The main thing I'd have suggested would
be to not show the entire incident in the Middle East in it's entirety
so early in the film.  Because we see exactly what happens so early on,
we know everything we need to know and are just waiting for the rest of
the characters in the film to catch up.  Why not instead show us
portions of that scene in flashbacks as the film progresses, thereby
heightening the audience's interest in the film by having us not know
the entire truth right away?  Despite all that though, Rules of
Engagement is entertaining enough for me to recommend, as there's
definitely worse ways to spend your time. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Author
David N. Butterworth
        The Sonny and Cher vehicle "Good Times" notwithstanding, William
Friedkin's directorial career started strong, with such distinguished
movies as "The French Connection," "The Exorcist," and "Sorcerer" (although
many critics hated that one) highlighting his résumé.  Then began the big
decline: "Cruising" and "Deal of the Century," followed by a brief return
to form with "To Live and Die in L.A.," and then a spate of films no-one
ever heard of--"Stalking Danger," "Rampage," and "Python Wolf."  The '90s
weren't good to him either: "The Guardian" (a "'Hand That Rocks the Cradle"
rip-off), "Blue Chips" (A "Hoosiers" rip-off), and "Jade" (a "'Last
Seduction" rip-off).
        Genre-wise, Friedkin has been all over the map, but for his latest
effort he's settled on the post-Vietnam military courtroom drama "Rules of
Engagement," and one can only hope this fine accomplishment is the
beginning of an upward trend.
        The film is a cross between "Platoon," "Three Kings," and "A Few
Good Men" (call it "A King, His Platoon, and a Few Really Bad Men").  It
follows the checkered career of Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson),
a decorated military officer who, after his successful part in the Vietnam
war, is given command of a special operations force off the coast of Yemen.
        Dispatched to provide evacuation assistance to the U.S. Embassy
under siege by hostile anti-American demonstrators, Childers finds himself
in the middle of a volatile situation in which three of his men are killed.
With pressure mounting, Childers orders his marines to open fire into the
crowd and after the dust has settled, 83 Yemeni men, women, and children
lie dead.  Charged with murder and facing a military court martial for his
role in the botched withdrawal, Childers calls upon his old friend retired
Colonel Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) to defend him.
        Childers saved Hodges' life during a Vietnam ambush so Hodges, a
self-confessed "weak lawyer," owes him.  "I'm a good enough lawyer to know
you need a better lawyer than me" Hodges tells Childers.  Nevertheless he
takes the case.
        There's a nice, easy-going chemistry between Jackson and Jones that
keeps this film engaging.  In addition, Childers' moral dilemma of shooting
into an unarmed crowd when his men are dying all around him is given an
interesting treatment by screenwriter Steven Gaghan.  For the first half of
its running time, "Rules of Engagement" paints this situation jet black,
and then turns full circle and paints it entirely white, leaving the
pivotal "guilty or not guilty" outcome a true nailbiter.
        As loud and violent in the courtroom as in its combat sequences
(the latter try to out-muscle "'Private Ryan" but don't quite make the
grade), "Rules of Engagement" is a tense and gripping thriller buoyed along
by uniformly fine performances.  Complementing the splendid Jackson and
equally impressive Jones are Guy Pearce ("L.A. Confidential") as
prosecuting attorney Major Mark Biggs (he's tough as nails), Ben Kingsley
as the impotent U.S. Ambassador to Yemen, Bruce Greenwood as National
Security Advisor Bill Sokol (Greenwood plays Sokol with an oiliness of
Exxon Valdez proportions), and Blair Underwood as one of Childers' captains
who's called as a witness.  The only disappointment is Anne Archer, who's
once again subjected to playing The Wife (this time Ben Kingsley's) without
much more than that job description to work with.
        This fine cast and credible story is pulled together by the sure
hand of director Friedkin who, with this film, has given his sagging career
a much-needed shot in the arm.  For all of its familiar military scenarios,
"Rules of Engagement" is a much better film than anybody might have
expected.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 2000.
Starring Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Bruce Greenwood, Guy 
Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Anne Archer, Blair Underwood, Philip Baker Hall,
Nicky Katt.
Written by James Webb (story) and Stephen Gaghan (screenplay).
Directed by William Friedkin.
Rated R.
Have you ever seen a movie that, no matter how much you tried to wrap
your head around it after leaving the theater, you just couldn't
figure out what in the world it was trying to say? That you weren't
sure if you liked or hated, merely because you had no idea what it was
really about? Such was my reaction to "Rules of Engagement." As with
most films, it has its good points and its bad points, but in this
one, there isn't a clear dominance of one over the other. The bad
points perfectly negate the good points, and it' s not just a question
of dramatic effectiveness. The themes are contradictory too. Every
time you think you have a handle on the movie's main "point," you
think of something else that contradicts it. The result is a film that
is tough to label as "bad," but is also far from being good.
Col. Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) and Col. Terry Childers (Samuel L.
Jackson) are old Marine buddies with a strong connection: Childers
saved Hodges' life in Vietnam. Now old friends, Hodges is retiring
from his career as a military lawyer and Childers is leading a mission
to Yemen, where a crowd of protesters have begun a demonstration
outside the American embassy.  Upon arriving, Childers finds the crowd
much more hostile than intelligence reports had indicated. After
evacuating the ambassador (Ben Kingsley) and his family, Childers
returns to find his troops under heavy fire. He gives them the order
to fire into the crowd. Reports of the shooting reach American
newspapers, and the military subsequently receives harsh criticism for
what the public believes to be a breach of the Geneva convention, an
illegal slaughter of innocent civilians. Looking for a scapegoat, the
scheming National Security Advisor William Sokal (Bruce Greenwood)
places the blame on Childers and plans to bring him up on charges of
murder.  Childers, eschewing an assigned defender, asks Hodges to be
his counsel, despite the latter's assertion that he is a "poor
lawyer."
"Rules of Engagement" is such a contradictory film that a review of it
might be well served by merely listing the good and the bad. So that's
exactly what I'm going to do.
The good: The cast has been very well assembled. Jones and Jackson are
acting powerhouses, interesting by their mere presence. Guy Pearce
does a decent (though strangely chosen) American accent, Bruce
Greenwood is appropriately smarmy (apparently carrying over much of
his smarm from "Double Jeopardy"), and there are good supporting jobs
turned in by Ben Kingsley, Philip Baker Hall, and Nicky Katt. The bad:
These characters are fairly clumsily sketched. The camaraderie between
Jones and Jackson is indicated by a few contrived lines of dialogue
("Your only real problem, Hayes, is that you never lived up to your
father.") and an unbelievably stupid fist fight scene. The supporting
characters get even shorter shrift, with good actors like Kingsley and
Blair Underwood wasted in superfluous subplots that only look like
they're going somewhere. They're not. Anne Archer's part as the
ambassador's wife is so useless, and her few token scenes so riddled
with clumsy dialogue, that she comes off as a bad actress.  Her
attempt to breathe life into the character by hamming it up does not
work.
The good: There are plenty of crackling scenes, most notably the early
battle sequences, one in Vietnam and one in Yemen, that are filmed
with a nice amount of whirlwind action. Director William Friedkin is
clearly taking pages from both Spielberg's "Saving Private Ryan" here;
his bob-and-weave camera technique and in-the-action sound recording
create the feel of being in combat nicely. Likewise, some of the
courtroom scenes, however cheesy they may be, are well-acted and
filled with clever dialogue. It's not "A Few Good Men," but for a
bunch of testosterone-fueled speechifying-lawyer stuff, it's pretty
good. The bad: For every powerful scene, there's an equally dead one
to accompany it. There is the aforementioned Jones-Jackson fist fight,
and also any scene involving the ambassador's wife. Then there's
virtually anything in between the opening battles and the courtroom
business.  Every time you think the film might start getting good, it
pulls itself down again quickly, either by drawing scenes out longer
than necessary (Jones spends far too much time in Yemen, considering
how little it all ends up signifying) or by drawing attention to the
stupidity of the characters (I still don't know why the N.S.A. didn't
just release the hidden tape to the public, especially since it seems
to exonerate the U.S. on all counts) or the multiple plot holes. (Why
didn't Childers just fire at the snipers in the first place, anyway?
The Marines had a tactical advantage over the demonstrators.)
But thin characters and plot holes can be forgiven if a film is
genuinely entertaining, as "Rules of Engagement" often is, or if the
film delivers some pointed social commentary. Unfortunately, this film
also runs into problems with clarifying just what its message is
supposed to be. Some reviewers have criticized it for having a
right-wing bent. I can understand how one might see it that way -- the
resolution seems to advance the rather suspect argument that "If you
weren't there in combat, you're in no place to judge." If that's the
case, why have military trials at all? Even so, if we' re supposed to
consider "Rules of Engagement" a conservative film, what are we to
make of the brief, but notable, scenes of Jackson's character losing
his cool? We see that his firing into the crowd may have been
understandable, but that he might have made a better decision by
firing at the snipers. The film seems to reinforce the conservative
argument by painting the Arab characters as liars or needlessly
violent savages, but then what are we to think about the sequence in
which Jones' character visits wounded children in a Yemeni hospital?
Too bad the film ultimately manages to render any debate about the
ambiguity of war useless by painting its characters as obvious heroes
and villains, giving us a thoroughly sappy ending (whose worst part is
the ridiculous "final salute"), and leaving many pressing aspects of
the issue unaccounted for. Perhaps one of the defense's strongest
arguments, that Childers shouldn 't have been sent into such a hostile
area without correct information, isn' t touched upon at all. And what
may be the most pressing question of all seems to have been the most
overlooked: Why was there a protest in the first place? "Rules of
Engagement" isn't a bad film, but it's one that is often too
dramatically and intellectually inert to warrant a full
recommendation.  I suppose "Rules" is entertaining in its own small
way, but it's a very small way.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Author
Scott Renshaw
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT
(Paramount)
Starring:  Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Guy Pearce, Bruce
Greenwood, Blair Underwood, Philip Baker Hall, Anne Archer, Ben Kingsley.
Screenplay:  Stephen Gaghan.
Producers:  Richard D. Zanuck and Scott Rudin.
Director:  William Friedkin.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, combat violence, adult themes)
Running Time:  128 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'm not sure which would be more depressing -- if the makers of RULES
OF ENGAGEMENT were simply exploiting soldiers for a gung-ho patriotic
courtroom drama, or if they actually believed they were doing justice to
the complexities of warfare. The former would be a fairly typical case of
Hollywood opportunism, a predictable but nonetheless annoying reduction of
tangled moral issues to simple flag-waving absolutes. The latter would
indicate good intentions gone horribly awry in the execution. You can
figure out everything you need to know about how RULES OF ENGAGEMENT will
approach its Marine characters from the tag line on the poster, set 
against a shot of Samuel L. Jackson carrying a young boy to safety: "A
hero should never have to stand alone."
     From the set-up, there's reason to hope for and expect something
more. A prologue set in 1968 Vietnam introduces us to Marines Terry
Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) and Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), brothers
in arms connected for life when Childers helps save a wounded Hodges'
life during battle. Flash forward 28 years, where both men are colonels,
but Childers is a commander while Hodges is about to retire after three
decades of military law desk work. But its Hodges' turn to come to
Childers' rescue after a mission at the American embassy in Yemen goes
sour, resulting in the deaths of 83 people including women and children. 
Though Childers insists he was responding to gunfire from the protesters,
he faces a court-martial for murder when evidence suggests he ordered the
attack on civilians without provocation. It's up to Hodges, as Childers'
defense attorney, to save his career.
     That's fertile ground to explore the split-second life-and-death
decisions involved in combat, including the possibility that good soldiers
can still make bad decisions based on emotional reaction. We see in the
Vietnam prologue that Childers is capable of resorting to extreme acts
under extreme circumstances, leading to reasonable questions about his
mental state, and the mental state of any military commander. Did the
gunfire to which Childers responded actually come from the jeering crowd
below, instead of just from the rooftop snipers above? Is Childers a
hot-head willing to commit murder to save his men? Are such means
justified by the ends of saving the lives of fellow soldiers? Is there
anything as black-and-white as the notion of a hero where warfare is
concerned?
     I refer you again to that tag line for the answer to the final
question, and by extension every other question the film could have
raised. For you see, there is no question about whether or not Childers
responded appropriately; there's videotape evidence to prove that he did.
There's also a nasty National Security Advisor (Bruce Greenwood) to hide
and eventually destroy that videotape evidence, creating an easy villain
when a much more interesting villain would have been the chaos of combat
itself. The painfully drawn-out courtroom sequences might have been a
place for exploring issues of how hair-splitting rules of engagement are
interpreted when the bullets are flying. Instead, they're a place to
conclude that Hodges is even a worse lawyer than he self-deprecatingly
calls himself, since he never bothers to check the embassy building for
the angle of entry of bullet holes.
     Jones and Jackson are, of course, talented actors whose intensity
makes it easier to watch everything they do. It's simply obvious from the
first moments of RULES OF ENGAGEMENT that they're not playing characters.
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT is about as thoroughly plot-driven as movies get,
filled to its two hour-plus rim with action, exposition and testimony.
It's too busy being a melodrama to worry about ambiguity or nuance of
character, too busy appealing to viewers eager to root for Our Boys
against the Bureaucracy. In fact, RULES OF ENGAGEMENT is so enamored with
its own sense of doing justice to military men that it ends with the kind
of postscript captions usually associated with fact-based films, just to
let you know that those weasels in suits eventually got theirs. Heroes
will never have to stand alone. Not as long as there are simple-minded
crowd-pleasers like RULES OF ENGAGEMENT to stand up for the idea that
heroes are always right.

Author
R.L. Strong
PARAMOUNT PICTURES PRESENTS IN ASSOCIATION WITH SEVEN ARTS PICTURES
A RICHARD D. ZANUCH / SCOTT RUDIN PRODUCTION   A WILLIAM FRIEDKIN FILM
"The line between being a Hero and a Murderer is a very, very thin
one"
So says Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) in his attempt to
defend his friend Colonel Terry L. Childers (Samuel L. Jackson)
against charges of ordering his troops to fire on an unarmed group of
protesters at the U.S. embassy in Yemen. "Rules of Engagement" is an
interesting film on many levels but ultimately doesn't quite work
because of a week second half.
The film opens in Vietnam in 1968, as Marine Colonels Hayes Hodges and
Terry Childers work their way through the jungle. Splitting up to find
an enemy strong hold, the two teams are attacked. Childers' squad is
attacked first but manages to capture the Vietnamese Colonel Cao
(Baoan Coleman). It is almost immediately afterwards that Hodges troop
is attacked while crossing a swamp. The casualties are high and Hodges
is wounded. As Childers hears the fire fight, he commands Colonel Cao
to radio his men and order them to retreat. Childers' threatens Cao
with death if the order is not carried out. Cao refuses. Childers'
then shoots and kills Cao's radio operator. Cao then relents under
fear of his own death.
Hodges is saved. Childers is a hero and the two men cement a
friendship that will stand as a greater honor than anything else in
the Marine Corps. The film moves forward to present day. Colonel Hayes
Hodges is retiring. A career marine, Hodges feels weary and tired,
disappointed in not living up to his Father's (Philip Baker Hall)
legacy.
In the Middle East, tensions are rising. Situations come to a head
when the U.S. Embassy in Yemen is surrounded by a large crowd of
Demonstrators.  Snipers fire at the builder, as workers scramble
trying to salvage whatever they can. Ambassador Mourain  (Ben
Kingsley), his wife (Anne Archer) and their son are all in danger. The
U.S. Government orders the marines to send in a rescue team to extract
the Americans and their families. Col. Terry Childers, is ordered to
lead a squadron of Marines in the rescue attempt. Dodging sniper fire,
Hodges locates the Ambassador and leads him and his family to a
waiting helicopter. Childers them returns to the roof of the Embassy
to retrieve the U.S. flag. In the process, one of Childers' men is
killed. Childers sends the Ambassador on his way, and returns to his
troops. Two more marines are killed. Childers then orders his men to
open fire on the crown gathered at the front of the Embassy. More than
the 80 Yemeni men, women and children killed by Marine gunfire.
The situation comes to a head when word gets back to the State
Department. A political firestorm has begun. National  Security
Adviser, William Sokal (Conrad Bachmann), demands that Colonel
Childers be brought up on charges of murder. As there is no evidence
that the crowd in front of the Embassy had weapons, Childers must have
fired into the crowd of civilians, instead of firing at the snipers on
the roofs across from the Embassy,.
Knowing that the situation is dire, Childers goes to the one man whom
he feels can help him.. Hayes Hodges. The two men start to investigate
the case with only eight days before Court Marshal proceedings begin.
Hodges has trepidation's about his abilities. He's not a very good
attorney and knows it. With the short time he has, Hodges  flies to
Yemen in an effort to find a corroborating witness for his friend and
client. When Hodges returns, his own doubts about his friend
jeopardize both the case and their friendship.
"Rules of Engagement" is seemingly an honest film. The first half of
the feature is very well played, with a good level of intensity and
commitment. It's the second half of the film, the trial itself when
the film starts to bog down into typical cinematic territory. The
biggest mistake the film makes is in having a nominal villain in the
piece.
Having the National Security Adviser commit such a heinous act in the
body of the film completely stops the momentum of the film dead in its
tracks. Giving the audience an identifiable bad guy is such a
concession to market research, that the film cannot recover from it.
Furthermore, the film did not need this concession, as the plot
creates the situation without it. The addition of the scene becomes
redundant.
One of the biggest and most noble surprises in the film, is the honest
and non-inflammatory was that the Marine Corps are portrayed. The
introductory scenes in Vietnam are as palpable as anything by Kubrick
or Oliver Stone. This sequence is very well directed and performed,
and is a grand introduction to the rest of the film.
The courtroom scenes are as traditional as one could expect. As with
other films of this type, it is the performances that carry the scenes
forward. Samuel L. Jackson carries his scenes with an intense and
proud demeanor. His Colonel Terry L. Childers is a proud Marine and a
proud man. His instinctive and passionate command is both refreshing
and invigorating. A very good performance.
Tommy Lee Jones gives the best performances in the film. A man,
equally proud of his military command, but haunted by his own
failures. As Retired Colonel Hayes Hodges is called back into duty at
the request of his friend, Jones plays the difficult emotions and
crisis with a subtle grace that simmers with both apprehension and
self doubt. Tommy Lee Jones has always given credible and exciting
performances, but here he is called upon to internalize his fear and
anger. And when they finally come to the surface, that explosion is
also reigned in. In his fight with Childers, Hodges continually
hesitates. Doubting his own conclusions, and again disliking himself
for not trusting the man who had save his life in Vietnam.
"Rules of Engagement" marks the return of famed Director William
Friedkin. Friedkin's career has been spotty over the last decade.
While his style and finesse have always been beyond reproach, his
choice of material has not always been up to the level of his talent.
Here, the director has a script that challenges him while also playing
it safe. There is much to like about the film. "Rules of Engagement"
does not succumb to the jingoist marching usually associated with
films about the military. Nor does it play the military as inherently
evil. The soldiers are all played as men who have chosen to serve
their country. And for a change, the soldiers are shown to have
individual ideals and passions. Guy Pearce (as Prosecutor Major Mark
Biggs) almost stealing the film from the two leads. Pearce (who was
remarkable in "L.A. Confidential"), continues to amaze the audience
with his command of dialects (he is Australian), and the naturalness
of his performance.
"Rules of Engagement" is a marginally good film. It is worth seeing.
But it would have played much better had not the villainous subterfuge
been so obvious. A concession to modern day teen audiences, that the
film is not even aimed at.
Owner & Copyright Š 2000 R. L Strong  All Rights Reserved
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed
without the express written permission of the author.

Author
Eugene Novikov
Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Tommy Lee Jones, Guy Pearce, Bruce
Greenwood, Ben Kingsley. Directed by William Friedkin. Rated R.
I'm not the first to say this, but Rules of Engagement is a real
testament to the skills of three great actors. The movie itself is
utterly hollow, a confused diatribe unable or unwilling to determine
what exactly its convictions are. I've heard that the reason for this
is the film's commercialization for easy access by a wide audience and
for once, it may have been for the best. As it stands, I would have
probably enjoyed the film far less had it been a moral lesson rather
than just an entertaining popcorn flick.
The movie begins in the jungles of Vietnam, where Colonels Terry
Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) and Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) are
under a surprise guerrilla attack by North Vietnamese soldiers. Hodges
is shot. A desperate Childers executes a Vietnamese soldier in an
effort to make the general tell his troops to back off. He then drages
Hodges to safety. This scene is there to set up the fact that Hodges is
indebted to Childers -- something that will become important later on.
Years pass. Hayes Hodges is now a small-time military lawyer about to
retire; Childers is still an active Colonel. One day, he is sent to the
American embassy in Yemen, where native protesters have surrounded the
building with the ambassador (Ben Kingsley) inside and are getting
rowdy. In essense, this is a babysitting mission: go in, get the
ambassador out, leave. But things get more complicated than that. It
seems there are snipers set up in strategic locations around the
building and the crowd also seems to have weapons. Childers' marines
start to get shot. Panicking, Childers orders his men to fire into the
crowd, yelling "Waste the motherfuckers." 73 Yemenese civilians die;
over a hundred are injured.
Back at home, the head honchos of the military are scared to death of a
scandal. The National Security Adviser (Bruce Greenwood) decides to
avoid fingers pointed at the American military by blaming the whole
thing on Col. Childers. He destroys the tape that proves that the crowd
in front of the embassy did indeed have weapons. Childers is court
marshaled and charged with murder. He asks his old friend Hayes to
defend him. At first, Hayes is reluctant ("I'm a good enough lawyer to
know that you need a better lawyer than me.") but finally gives in
because of his debt to his friend. Meanwhile, Major Mark Biggs (Guy
Pearce), a big-shot, Stanford-educated lawyer, volunteers to prosecute.
Rules of Engagement is one of the more engrossing military dramas that
I've seen. It was directed by William Friedkin (The Exorcist), who has
a flair for undistinctive, unpretentious but always effective
camerawork. He uses camera tricks but he doesn't over use them (ahem,
Oliver Stone) and the result is a movie that flows smoothly, grabbing
your attention from point one and never letting go.
Friedkin really has his stars to thank for that. Jackson is excellent,
despite having the most bombastic and least versatile of the roles in
the movie. Even in his character's most defeated state, he still exudes
authority. Jones has opportunities for poignancy, action and even
laughs. Despite being typecast nowadays, he's still a consistently
entertaining actor -- and as a lawyer, he's unbeatable. I also liked
what Guy Pearce did with the thankless role of the prosecuting
attorney. He's a villain in the story, yes, but Pearce makes him a
little more than that: a ruthless man with a little sympathy running
underneath.
It should be said that Rules of Engagement has absolutely no message.
It doesn't know what it wants to say, or even if it wants to say
anything. It takes a point of view: Col. Childers should not be
punished because the crowd had weapons and he was defending his men.
And then it begins to thematically eat itself by starting to make
arguments for the other side. It goes back and forth that way until we
abandon all hope of the film actually being significant and focus on
the glorious performances and the smart, concise, enjoyable dialogue.
The courtroom scenes, at least, have the force of conviction.
When push comes to shove, Rules of Engagement comes through as a
mindless courtroom melodrama and inevitably fails on the rare occasions
when it tries to pass itself off as something more than that. It's not
brain food, but no one will be bored.

Author
Homer Yen
"Rules of Engagement" is a film that starts off
promisingly as a drama that combines the elements of
friendship, honor, sacrifice and conspiracy.  But just
when it seems that the power of the film is about to
be unleashed, the movie somehow implodes.  It switches
gears in the latter half of the film and becomes a
debate about military ethics and codes of conduct,
ultimately degenerating into a formulaic military
courtroom drama.  We know that at some point during
the trial, the accused will slam the podium in front
of him in disgust, stand up, and let forth a roar that
sounds conspicuously like "you can't handle the
truth."
The film begins with an intense and well-executed
Vietnam-era battle sequence that introduces us to
Childers (Samuel L. Jackson) and Hodges (Tommy Lee
Jones), two soldiers in the same unit that become
lifelong friends.   This battle results in heavy
casualties, though these two are lucky enough to
survive.  Hodges finishes out his military career as a
mildly successful lawyer.  Childers, however, has
continued to serve his country admirably through
several dangerous conflicts, and is now a highly
decorated Colonel.  
The courtroom sequence that I mention above occurs as
a result of the actions taken by Childress. He and his
troop are sent on a difficult mission to protect a
foreign embassy and its diplomat (Ben Kingsley) from
an unruly mob.  At the scene, rocks are being thrown,
bullets are being shot, and firebombs are being
ignited.  The situation is getting ugly.  Childers'
men are coming under fire that causes him to issue a
questionable order.  This has dire ramifications for
him and for our country.  To quell the international
furor that has arisen, a conspiracy begins to rear its
ugly head.  As a result, Childress will be
court-martialed and may face a long prison sentence.
Childress asks Hodges to defend him.  At first
reluctant, Hodges says, "I'm good enough to know that
you need someone better than me."  But it's hard for
him to refuse his lifelong friend.  He works quickly
to gather evidence, to interview witnesses, and to
determine the fate of videotape that may exonerate
him.
Once the story moved inside the courtroom, however,
the momentum generated begins to dissipate.  This is
not the fault of Jones and Jackson, who are two very
talented actors.  But there is nothing less satisfying
than watching a couple of attorneys question and
cross-examine a slew of witnesses as they try to
convince a jury that their particular case is the one
to believe.  Even worse, there are many missed
opportunities that could have been effectively used. 
For example, the diplomat gives false testimony to
make himself look better.  His wife (Anne Archer)
knows that he's lying.  We are teased with the
possibility that this will lead to something dramatic.
 But it never happens.  
Despite the fact that "Rules of Engagement" loses much
of its momentum during the trial phase, there were
still enough positive points to recommend this
offering.  It starts off as a taut and suspenseful
film.  Good points about combat ethics and actions
under fire are brought up.  Tommy Lee Jones and Samuel
L. Jackson bring wit and energy to their roles.  There
is also an undeniable pleasure derived from watching
the gritty Jones defend his friend against the
tenacious government prosecutor (Guy Pearce).  But
given the ethical quandaries that the film brings
forth, the film's resolution was too quick and easy. 
There seems to be a message that is trying to be sent.
 The film is unconvincing in its ability to deliver
it.

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "RULES OF ENGAGEMENT" (Paramount Pictures)
 It's the sheer star power of Tommy Lee Jones and Samuel
L. Jackson that propels this picture. Based a novel by James Webb,
former Secretary of the Navy, it revolves around a highly decorated
30-year Marine veteran, Col. Terry Childers (Jackson), who is
court-martialed. The case involves an incident in which the
U.S. Embassy in Yemen was surrounded by angry, fanatic
demonstrators. Amid the violence, Childers was ordered to take in
three helicopters and evacuate the terrified Ambassador (Ben Kingsley)
and his family. In the subsequent melee, three of his Marines were
killed and, following his explicit orders, his men gunned down 83
Yemeni civilians - men, women and children - and wounded many
others. Col. Childers became a scapegoat in the diplomatic outcry that
followed . To mount his defense, Childers chooses a wartime buddy, a
cynical, just-retired Marine lawyer, Hays Hodges (Jones), whose life
he saved in Vietnam back in 1968. Together, they face off against a
malevolent National Security Adviser (Bruce Greenwood) and a young,
zealous prosecutor (Guy Pearce) - but they lack the hard evidence
necessary to present a strong defensive case. Director William
Friedkin captures the intense tension of this combat-and-courtroom
drama but he's hampered by Stephen Gaghan's hackneyed, predictable
screenplay which is marred by superficial characterizations and
cliche-ridden dialogue. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "Rules
of Engagement" is a slick, suspenseful 7. And, if you enjoy this kind
of provocative, what-really-happened enigma, I recommend "Courage
Under Fire" with Meg Ryan and Denzel Washington, which delves into a
combat incident during the Gulf War.

Author
James Sanford
         We've often heard the Marines are looking for a few good men,
and director William Friedkin seems intent on creating another "A Few
Good Men" in "Rules of Engagement," another drama about the terrible
consequences that can result when military officers make the wrong
choices in the heat of the moment. In "Rules," that officer is Col.
Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson), a 30-year veteran of the Marine
Corps who oversees the evacuation of the U.S. Embassy in Yemen. By the
time it's all over, 83 Yemenis are dead and more than 100 are wounded.
 Everyone agrees there was a demonstration outside the building,
that the protesters got a little rowdy and that snipers took a few
potshots at the Marines. But there's controversy over whether or not
Childers was justified in ordering his troops to fire on the crowd. Some
observers insist the Marines were gunning down unarmed civilians;
Childers thinks he saw weapons in the hands of some of the women and
children.
 With an international scandal brewing, the stage is set for a
court-martial, and Childers turns to his old friend Col. Hayes Hodges
(Tommy Lee Jones) to defend him. Since National Security Advisor William
Sokal (Bruce Greenwood) has secretly destroyed the videotape that would
back up Childers' charges -- "Why should the United States be held
responsible for the actions of one man?" Sokal argues -- Hodges and
Childers face an uphill battle.
 "Rules of Engagement" has some points of interest, not the
least of which are the performances of Jones and Jackson. Jackson pours
so much barely contained intensity into Childers the audience can't
always be sure he was thinking clearly during the incident, and that
keeps the interest percolating. After sleepwalking through so many of
his recent films ("U.S. Marshals" and "Double Jeopardy" immediately come
to mind), Jones again reminds us here what a resourceful, exciting actor
he can be. There's entertaining work from the prosecution as well, with
Guy Pearce ("L.A. Confidential") contributing an attention-grabbing turn
as a showboating lawyer anxious to send Childers to prison.
 The acting can only go so far, however, in camouflaging the
movie's dullish screenplay. Writer Stephen Gaghan, who trained in
television, tends to sacrifice depth and characterization in the name of
narrative, meaning we're served copious flashbacks to Childers'
experiences in Vietnam but few meaningful details about his personal
life. As for Sokal and the weak-willed ambassador (Ben Kingsley)
Childers saved, they're pure cardboard, just another pair of easily
vilified bureaucrats.
 As expected, "Rules" climaxes with the trial, and although
Friedkin inserts many extreme close-ups of Childers' angry eyes and
Hodges' furrowed brow, the finale still seems awfully cut-and-dried.
Unlike the much better "Courage Under Fire," in which viewers had at
least four different sides of a story to choose from, "Rules" offers
only two, and only one of them is genuinely credible. In a courtroom
that's sometimes the case, but in a movie we need a more substantial
pay-off after two hours of build-up. James Sanford

Author
Max Messier
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Max Messier.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/3cfb7dbc874650df882568930009921c?OpenDocument
The best thing about being a critic is getting to see unreleased films
weeks and sometimes months before the general audience does.  The
toughest thing about being a critic is being subjected to the waste
products of the movie industry, run by conglomerates that wouldn't know
a Cronenberg film from a bottle of Heineken.
Rules of Engagement is one of these waste products: pulling together a
great cast, a great story idea, and a great director, then letting it
all fall apart into a mess of things I wouldn't even blame Joel
Schumacher for.
The movie revolves around the trial of an accused Army officer (Samuel
Jackson) trying to subdue an attack on the US Embassy in Yemen, but who
ends up quelling the dispute by having his men fire into the crowd of
demonstrators.  All evidence that would justify his actions becomes MIA,
and he calls upon his friend and fellow comrade-in-arms, Tommy Lee
Jones, to defend him.  Jones complies out of a sense of honor, because
during a tour in Nam, Jackson saved Jones' ass during a VC ambush.
Soon, everything turns against Jackson and his defense team, and then
the movie runs through about three or four different plot twists stolen
from such films as The Verdict, The Rainmaker, A Few Good Men, and
Courage Under Fire.  In the end, I was clawing at my seat, wanting to
run home and watch a decent film to remind myself why I like movies in
the first place.
Strangely, all the elements of the film were there.  It starts with a
great cast of Tommy Lee Jones, Sam Jackson, Guy Pearce (doing his best
De Niro impression), Philip Baker Hall, Ben Kingsley, Anne Archer, and
Kim Delaney.  Running the show is the great William Friedkin, of such
films as The Exorcist, French Connection, and To Live and Die in L.A.
There's a compelling story of a man's defense of his honor and the
comrades compelled the stand by him to defend said honor.  A background
littered with the conflict of war and the regrets of past defeats.  How
can you screw that up?
Well, you just can.  The film is flawed on many fronts:  The horrible
miscasting of Guy Pearce as a Brooklyn Navy lawyer "just trying to get
to the truth of things."  A ridiculous courtroom scene that had me
waiting for someone to scream, "You can't handle the truth!"  Choppy
direction, which feels like Friedkin was running the show at first but
then an assistant director took the helm.  The underdeveloped characters
of Jones and Jackson.  Any semblance of "acting."  And a really, really
bad ending that tells us sickly that the brutality of war is
justifiable.
The shoulders that carry most of the blame are the screenwriters, who
failed to piece together anything resembling a cohesive plot.  To wit,
two rules should be followed in the future whenever a studio is
considering to greenlighting a film. 1) Do not hire a former Secretary
of the U.S. Navy to write the screenplay. 2) Shy away from accepting
scripts from one of the uncredited screenwriters of I Still Know What
You Did Last Summer.
Director: William Friedkin
Writers: James Webb, Stephen Gaghan
Producers: Scott Rudin, Richard Zanuck
Starring: Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel Jackson, Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley,
Anne Archer
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten
 Paramount Pictures
 Director: William Friedkin, story by James Webb
 Writer:  Stephen Gaghan
 Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Kim Delaney,
Ben Kingsley, Guy Pearce, Blair Underwood, Anne Archer,
Amidou, Conrad Buchmann, Gordon Clapp, Dale Dye, Bruce
Greenwood, Philip Baker Hall
   If you've ever held a job with a large company, private or
public, you can testify to this: if your boss screws up, guess
who will bear the onus?  Your supervisor will hang you out to
dry.  You accept the censure: your overseer gets off the
hook.  In "Rules of Engagement," director William Friedkin,
using Stephen Gaghan's adaptation of a story by a former
Secretary of the Navy (and Marine infantry commander)
James Webb, takes this concept writ large.  If the United
States is about to go down for an alleged screw-up
somewhere in the world, the United States will try to pin the
blame on an individual.  Perhaps Lt. Calley's situation in My
Lai is the not the best example, but when that officer gunned
down unarmed civilians in Viet Nam, the lieutenant and not
the United States government was to be be held up to
rebuke.
   "Rules of Engagement" depicts a situation similar to that in
My Lai, however, except that in this circumstance, the
commanding officer who issues an order to gun down a
group of civilians in Yemen is justified.  Friedkin takes us
inside the Yemeni capital of S'ana (actually
filmed in Ouazazarte in southern Morocco) to show us a
fierce demonstration by about two hundred civilians plus
several rooftop snipers determined to gut the American
embassy and kill all personnel found therein.  The kicker is
that most of the Arab civilians, including at least one nine-
year-old girl and several black-robed women, are firing pistols
and automatic weapons in addition to flinging stones and
Molotov cocktails on what is sovereign United States territory
in that small country on the Saudi tip.  When Marine Col.
Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson), seeing some of his
fellow Marines killed by the bullets while the others troops in
his company are observing the snipers and not the crowd
below, he gives the order to "waste the m-f's."  The entire
group of demonstrators are hit by Marine bullets resulting in
83 dead and about 100 critical injuries.  Determined to get
the U.S. government off the hook by disavowing the action
and blaming an overzealous career military officer, National
Security Adviser William Sokal (Bruce Greenwood) arranges
to court-martial Childers and assigns Major Mark Biggs (Guy
Pearce) to prosecute the case.
   The final part of the movie involves the trial of Col.
Childers, who is defended by the accused's old wartime
buddy Col. Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), with whom he
fought side by side thirty years previously in Viet Nam.  Much
is made of Hodges's inexperience as a lawyer--that he has
had a long-standing drinking problem, that he graduated
sixty-seventh in his class at Georgetown Law, and that he is
divorced.  But while given the sort of movie that this is we
may expect even an inept attorney to clear Childers despite
the lawyer's ineptitude, Gaghan's script subverts the
presumption and allows Hodges to mount a fiery defense.
   In this high-budget, slickly commercial movie, Friedkin
keeps the pace moving at a swift pace, becoming frenetic in
scenes involving battle.  The Moroccan extras performing as
Yeminis on a jihad against America are so fired up by their
role in storming the embassy that we don't wonder at the
ease with which the fundamentalists in the Arab world are
able to pitch fervor into the hearts of their recruits.  The
stones fly wildly, battering the shabby structure of the
embassy as though flung from battering rams determined to
bring down a Scottish castle.  We almost expect a Marine
guard inside the embassy to call out, "Hang out our banners
on the outward walls;/ Our castle's strength/ Will laugh a
siege to scorn."  Some of the Viet Nam battle scenes that
open the movie are taut, realistic, and could have been
directed with pride even by Oliver Stone.  While the colonels,
Hodges and Childers, are not developed characters, they
need not be.  All we need to know is that they were Marine
buddies who fought side by side, dependent on each other
for their very lives, to see the depths to which Hodges would
go in defending the highly decorated and now beleaguered
soldier.
   Once again, the U.S. government is portrayed as the bad
guys.  As National Security Adviser William Sokal, Bruce
Greenwood comes across as the epitome of evil, his bland
and mellifluous voice signalling us that this is the sort of con
artist we must all watch out for.  Guy Pearce is a strange
choice for prosecutor though.  With hair closely cropped even
for a military officer, Pearce has lost any trace of his native
accent and substitutes a strange brogue that combines a
Brooklyn dialect with New England vernacular.  Putting aside
the saintly roles to which he is accustomed, Ben Kingsley
makes the perfect cowering ambassador, a high official who--
together with his iniquitous wive (Anne Archer)--suddenly
forgets the debt he owes to the heroic Childers for getting
him out of Yemen alive when his career is spuriously
threatened by Adviser Sokal.
  "Rules of Engagement" may be a feel good movie that lacks
the imaginative thrusts of David O. Russell's "The Three
Kings," but for what it is this is one of the better examples.  =
William Friedkin directs us to a man who successfully stands
up to the heinous machinations of a U.S. eager to cover its
own rear.  What lies open to future judgment, though, is the
danger faced by our government as a result of this court
martial.  Does the U.S. risk even greater militancy from the
fundamentalists in the Middle East?  Even more crucial, can
America prevent the withering of its support among the
moderate states of the area, including Egypt, Morocco and
even Turkey?  These are not questions that the typical movie
fan is going to bother with.  "Rules of Engagement" is, after
all, a rah-rah film whose cinematography makes up for its
domestic drabness in Washington scenes with a ravishing
array of North African colors, and supplies us with
two heroes who fight against the odds to make a crucial
point: if you're not under combat, do not assume that you can
always find a diplomatic solution when unreasonable people,
powered by fanatical beliefs, are determined to do you in.
Rated R.  Running time: 129 minutes.  (C) 2000 by Harvey
Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Zachary McGhee
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT [Friedkin] -- Boy, did they screw up reel one!
Really a mess from minute one to forty-five, an introduction as thought
provoking as colored toilet paper, the movie takes a sudden turn
for interesting once the courtroom battle begins, Tommy Lee Jones and
Samuel L. Jackson kick into high gear, and those pathetic Saving Private
Ryan-wannabe battle scenes cease fire. It certainly feels like something
downloaded from the creative mind of one Tom Clancy, with A Few Good Men
tossed in for good measure. C+

Author
Walter Frith
Cast - Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Ben Kingsley, Blair Underwood,
Guy Pearce, Anne Archer, Philip Baker Hall, Bruce Greenwood
Directed by - William Friedkin
Written by - Stephen Gaghan based on a story by James Webb
Produced by - Scott Rudin and Richard D. Zanuck
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted) - Rated R
for scenes of war violence, and for language.
Running Length - 128 minutes
Distributor - Paramount Pictures
I had an acquaintance who aspired to be a film maker.  He had worked on a
number of low budget Hollywood productions as an associate film editor and
as an extra in others.  He went to film school and understood that mechanics
of film making.  His favourite movie star, actor and film maker was Warren
Beatty.  Upon watching one of William Friedkin's films with him, he quipped
at one point: "Typical William Friedkin direction".  He has a point.
Besides 'The French Connection' and 'The Exorcist', what has this man done
that is really considered landmark film making?  Friedkin's career seemed to
dry up after 'The Exorcist'.  Perhaps it was because of his frightful
reputation for allegedly abusing his cast and crew.  A real life priest
named Reverend William O'Malley, who played Father Dyer in 'The Exorcist',
administers the last rites to father Damien Karras (Jason Miller) at the end
of the film after Karras crashes down a flight of stairs.  If you watch
carefully, O'Malley's hand shakes as he makes the sign of the cross.  This
was NOT acting.  According to various reports, Friedkin slapped him across
the face to get him in character for that tragic scene and it worked
magnificently.  Friedkin is also said to have thrown the original music
score for 'The Exorcist', by Lalo Schifrin, into the studio parking lot in a
fit of rage because he thought it was so bad.  Credit the 25th anniversary
release of 'The Exorcist' on DVD for this information.  Friedkin never even
came close to re-gaining legendary status for any film after 'The Exorcist'
and 'Rules of Engagement' has Friedkin written all over it.  The
semi-documentary style of photography, long tracking shots, and blistering
performances make it a return to the old days for the Oscar-winning
director.
Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) and Colonel Terry L. Childers (Samuel
L. Jackson) play friends who have put their lives into serving their
country.  Childers has an important mission go awry in the eyes of some and
he has to go on trial for it.  While protecting U.S. Ambassador Mourain (Ben
Kingsley) and his family, including his wife (Anne Archer) in a third world
country, shots are fired at the embassy through a  protest turned violent by
the crowd and the lives of the Americans are clearly threatened.  The order
is given by Childers for his men to return fire and many civilians are
killed.  The entire fiasco is captured on video by the embassy's camera and
Childers is informed by his superior officer back home that he will go on
trial for murder as it is believed that Childers opened fire for for no
apparent reason!  It turns out that the military doesn't want a black eye
and the U.S. National Security Advisor, William Sokal (Bruce Greenwood),
destroys the tape that could clear Childers at trial and wants one man to
take the fall for the entire episode of events.
Childers enlists the aid of Colonel Hayes Hodges (Jones) to defend him at
trial.  Hodges' record is shaky and he tells Childers he needs a better
lawyer to go up against the government's top gun and prosecutor Major Mark
Biggs (Guy Pearce).  Other supporting players in the film such as
performances by Philip Baker Hall as Hodges' father and Blair Underwood as a
loyal and fellow officer side by side with Childers during the battle add
little to the film and this movie has a weird scope of academics about it.
My eyes were glued to the screen during the embassy shoot out and the whole
thing is staged very well.  Another plus to the film is the research put
forward by Hodges as he travels to the scene of the alleged crime by himself
and makes some interesting discoveries.  The court room scenes are also very
compelling but much of the film drags at other times.  The performance by
Guy Pearce as the military prosecutor is comparable to the performance by
Kevin Bacon in 'A Few Good Men' as Capt. Jack Ross, who prosecutes the case
against two young marines accused of murder.  Guy Pearce is best known for
his turn as the straight laced policeman Ed Exley in 'L.A. Confidential'.
He's an actor who is English born but who works the American accent very
well.
'Rules of Engagement' is one of those touchy/feely films that may strike a
nerve too close to government that will make some disregard it and want to
bury it.  Its entire structure is based on distrust of those in government
and the film will have a tough sell on many fronts as many politically
charged films usually do.  It has a believable ending, crisp performances
from its leads and William Friedkin doesn't exactly set any new trends but
his experiences as a calculated film maker save this from being a failure.
It is a watchable piece of entertainment that is somewhat predictable and is
another film since 1998's 'The Negotiator', and 1996's 'A Time to Kill',
that places Samuel L. Jackson's character on trial, whether it be in a
courtroom or in the minds of others.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
bob bloom

 Rules of Engagement (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Tommy Lee Jones,
Samuel L. Jackson, Guy Pearce, Bruce Greenwood and Ben Kingsley.
Directed by William Friedkin
 With debate continuing about the role of American troops in overseas
situations such as Kosovo, the new film, "Rules of Engagement," has a
current events timeliness to it.
 This court-martial drama, directed by William Friedkin, is a movie in
which ambiguity would have been an asset.
 Samuel L. Jackson plays Col. Terry Childers a Marine veteran sent with
a detachment of men to the U.S. Embassy in Yemen to evacuate its
personnel.
 The embassy is under siege with crowds throwing rocks and Molotov
cocktails at the compound, while snipers are firing into the buildings.
 After three of Childers' men are killed, he orders his men to fire -
not at the snipers - but into the crowd because he claims he sees them
brandishing weapons and firing up at his men. In the ensuing action, 83
civilians, including old men, women and children, are killed by the
Marines and more than 100 people are wounded.
 Public outcry calls for Childers' head and the U.S. government decides
to make him the sacrificial lamb and court-martial him.
 Childers chooses as his counsel Col. Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), a
longtime friend. The two served together in Vietnam and Childers saved
Hodges life.
 Hodges, who has had drinking problems as well as other personal woes,
admits he is not a very good lawyer and urges his friend to get someone
else to defend him.
 But Childers is adamant, and Hodges accepts the assignment.
 The interplay between the two veterans makes for compelling drama.
 Where "Rules of Engagement" fails is in the script, which employs the
tired device of a smarmy government official - the head of the National
Security Council played by Bruce Greenwood - who has a tape showing the
demonstrators with weapons. It's the old government coverup scam, which
has become a tired cliche.
 The tape would exonerate Childers, but not help the United States in
the world court of public opinion, so he has it destroyed.
 "Rules of Engagement" would have been a much better and more thoughtful
drama if the entire tape subplot had been eliminated or if we were not
shown scenes of the protesters firing their weapons.
 This is one movie that would have benefited from making the audience
decide if Childers took the correct course of action.
 The outcome of the court-martial is diluted because of the tape plot
device.
 However, the strong performances by Jackson and Jones are the movie's
main asset. The two actors exude charisma and are fun to watch.
 Jackson, ramrod straight, his eyes blazing is all semper fi, while
Jones is more subdued and vulnerable as the physically and mentally
wounded veteran.
 Guy Pearce, best remembered from "L.A. Confidential," is the firebrand
Marine prosecutor out to convict Childers. The Australian Pearce has
adopted an accent that makes him sound a bit like Matt Damon.
 "Rules of Engagement" is a flawed picture. There are a few slow spots;
it could have used some tighter editing.
 At a little over two hours, the movie drags a bit. Among the film's
other shortcomings is Friedkin's obsession with squibs.
 Mostly everyone who takes a bullet does so in slow-mo as blood erupts
in a cascade of spurting red.
 It's an unnecessary cliché from the 1970s.
 The movie, though, is entertaining and thoughtful. It could have used a
bit more backbone, which would have made it an even better drama.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. A member of the Online Film Critics Society, he can be reached at
bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net. 
For more reviews by Bob Bloom, go to www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Author
Rose 'Bams' Cooper
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT (2000) 
Rated R; running time 123 minutes
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0160797 
Official site: http://www.rulesmovie.com/  
Written by: Stephen Gaghan (based on the story by James Webb)
Directed by: William Friedkin
Starring: Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Bruce Greenwood, 
Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Blair Underwood, Anne Archer, 
Philip Baker Hall, Nicky Katt, Hayden Tank, Amidou (Dr. Ahmar), 
Mark Feuerstein (Captain Tom Chandler), Dale Dye (General Perry), J
ihane Kortobi (Little Girl)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsrules.html
If you had told me this time last week that there was even the most 
remote chance that I'd damn near fall asleep while watching anything 
starring acting powerhouses Samuel L. Jackson and Tommy Lee Jones, I 
would've laughed in your face.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson), a highly-decorated, 
no-nonsense field Marine, is assigned to "babysit" the Ambassador 
Mourain (Ben Kingsley), his wife (Anne Archer), and their son  Justin 
(Hayden Tank), during a protest by Yemeni citizens at the Yemen Embassy.  
He sends the terrified Ambassador and his family on their way, and 
proceeds to try to get the situation under control.  But something goes 
terribly wrong; when the protestors start shooting and killing Marines, 
Childers orders Captain Lee (Blair Underwood) to give the order to the 
Marines to "waste the motherf---ers", under the "rules of engagement": 
policies and procedures put forth by the US President and Secretary Of 
Defense that allow US military forces to take actions they deem 
necessary to protect themselves from hostile forces.
National Security Advisor Bill Sokal (Bruce Greenwood), needing a 
scapegoat to take the focus off the government's part in the death of 83 
Yemeni citizens, demands that Childers be courtmartialed for murder, and 
brings in Major Mark Biggs (Guy Pearce), a very capable military lawyer 
who has spent more time behind a desk than behind a rifle, to prosecute 
the case.  Knowing what he's up against, Childers seeks out 
newly-retired Colonel Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), with whom Childers 
served a tour of duty in Vietnam in 1968, saving Hodges' life when he 
was under severe fire by the enemy.  Hodges, however, doesn't have the 
confidence in himself that Childers has; seeing himself as only a 
"shot-at Marine" and a very weak lawyer, Hodges reluctantly takes 
Childers case--but soon discovers that things in this case may not be as 
they seem.
The Upshot:
I briefly watched CBS's early morning news-light program on Monday, and 
caught the tail end of Gail wazzername's review of this movie [which 
reminds me: though I can't remember her last name, it's undeniable that, 
even with the dismal ratings of this pseudo-news telecast, Ms. 
Wazzername should be considered a "nationally known Black reviewer".  
That last bit will mean something to those of you who've read the 
history behind 3BC.  But I digress].  I was more than a little shocked 
to hear her use terms such as "powerful" and "emotional" when describing 
this flick's contents.  I guess we must've watched two different movies; 
I've seen more emotions in a loaf of bread that anything I saw within 
"Rules".
The onus for this rests squarely on the shoulders of three men: director 
William Friedkin, and actors Samuel L. Jackson and (to a somewhat-lesser 
extent) Tommy Lee Jones.  Friedkin lost me early on; once that camera of 
his started looking like something straight out of NYPD-BLUE, I knew it 
would be a struggle to take this movie seriously.  Of course, it doesn't 
help that "Rules" has a very derivative, been there/done that feeling.  
It suffers from the comparisons with A FEW GOOD MEN, COURAGE UNDER FIRE, 
and for that fact, PLATOON.  And with the big push these days, post- 
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, toward movies about World War II, one has to wonder 
why Vietnam was the (bad) choice for a starting point here. 
As for Jackson and Jones, to say I was disappointed, would be an 
understatement.  I've always thought I'd be happy to watch these two 
read the Yellow Pages; but even that would've been more exciting than 
their flat performances in "Rules".  The normally-explosive Jackson had 
exactly three moments of powerful clarity: the first was his vintage 
Samuel L. "motherf---ers" outburst; the second was the Obligatory Fight 
Scene Between Friends (Childers and Hodges)--which led to Childers 
blurting out the cliched "you're nothing a drunk!" (which itself led to 
me rolling my eyes and groaning in dismay at the cliche); and the last 
was the also Obligatory, though still enjoyable, courtroom scene where 
Major Biggs confronted him about the original outburst.  That's it; 
everywhere else, Jackson could've been played by his stunt double, and I 
wouldn't have noticed.  Jones fared a little better; though he played 
against type in his portrayal of a Colonel without command--of himself, 
primarily--he did show a few moments when his strong acting skills were 
brought to the fore.  These moments were too few and far between, 
though, and I began thinking that his character shared between THE 
FUGITIVE and DOUBLE JEOPARDY would be a lot more fun to watch than the 
boring Colonel Hodges.
In a nutshell, I never once felt any real chemistry between Jackson and 
Jones; any feints toward Childers and Hodges supposed friendship rang 
hollow, and everything between Childers' outburst and the completely 
flat and unimaginative ending, felt like so much filler, with the 
outcome of the trial a foregone conclusion.  The outrageous epilogue 
only added insult to injury, but by that time, I was more than ready to 
quickly exit, stage right.
The supporting cast, had they been used to the extent of their 
abilities, might have made this movie somewhat more bearable.  Ben 
Kingsley playing a cowardly Ambassador?  Hey, that had legs; why didn't 
they explore it more?  Blair Underwood as a Captain asked to order the 
execution of what he thought were innocent citizens?  What a subplot! 
hmmm...but he's out of the movie almost as quickly as he was there.  
Philip Baker Hall as the senior General Hodges, playing against Jones as 
Hodges Jr., with the addition Nicky Katt as Hayes Hodges the third?  
Talk about your generation gap!  Talk about your clash of titans, 
between Hall and Jones!  Talk about your...what do you mean, they never 
really "talked" about it?  
Talk about a waste of potential.  There were a bright spots, however: as 
the "unfeeling" prosecutor, Guy Pearce's Major Biggs made more of his 
part than was probably written in the script.  Pearce, along with Anne 
Archer in her turn as the Ambassador's wife, and Hayden Tank as her 
convincingly frightened son, showed the only real emotion in this 
otherwise linear movie.
In the end, I had the same feeling of disconnect with "Rules" that I had 
with THE INSIDER, in that both of them presented the viewer with a 
"duh!" situation: "Big Tobacco/Government Evil Empires seek targets to 
take the brunt of the blame for their own Evildoing?  Duh!".  The 
difference between an "Insider" and a "Rules", though, is that the 
former engaged me with interesting--and interested--performances by the 
cast and crew.  "Rules" never came close; laughingly lame special 
effects (could that blood have looked more fake?), bad camerawork (clue 
number 1: please leave Shaky-Cam on ER and NYPD-BLUE where it belongs), 
ill-advised casting decisions (clue number 2: 1968 was more than 30 
years ago; if Tommy Lee and Samuel look exactly like they looked in 
1968's Vietnam, I'm a monkeys uncle.  Next time, don't be so cheap; 
splurge on younger lookalikes for the flashback scenes) and most of all, 
off-the-mark performances by its lead players, totally shot any chance 
that I could suspend my disbelief long enough to just ignore the bad for 
the little good that was there.
I can live with being The Only One who didn't find this movie 
compelling; the majority of reviews I've read thus far, pretty much laud 
"Rules" as the best movie of this dismal film season.  No matter; I 
stand firmly behind my opinion that there was precious little on the 
screen that came across as heartfelt.  The director and his 
actors--Jones and Jackson in particular--played by numbers that have 
been played much better in the past by actors with nowhere near the 
talent they have, and for those in the audience paying attention beyond 
the smoke and mirrors, that was the true insult. 
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
If I hadn't seen the neutering of two of the biggest bulls in the acting 
arena today--Tommy Lee Jones and Samuel L. Jackson--with my own two 
eyes, I wouldn't have believed it was possible.  Who'da thunkit?
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT (rating: yellowlight): 
In a word, "Rules" was disengaged.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Listen...I'm just about as sick of these Army/Navy/Air Force/Marine/lawyer
movies as you are, but for some strange reason (note: THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER
(4/10) grossed over $100Million last year), Hollywood keeps churning them
out by the truckload. This one slaps Tommy Lee Jones in as your
rough-around-the-edges lawyer (see any previous Lee Jones movie for similar
feel) and Sam Jackson as the man accused of a crime for which he claims to
be innocent (see any previous Jackson movie for similar feel). Put 'em all
together and you've got a recipe for disaster, right? Well, it wasn't so
bad... : )
PLOT:
A highly decorated Marine and his troops are sent into Yemen with orders to
oversee an apparently peaceful demonstration outside the U.S. Embassy. When
Marines start dropping like flies, the Colonel orders his troops to fire
into the crowd of demonstrators, slaying many an innocent victim. It isn't
long before the entire world is up in arms about the incident and demanding
justice. At this point, the U.S. government puts the Colonel on trial for
murder and the rest, as they say, is...well, a court case.
CRITIQUE:
An okay movie submitting nothing unique to the genre, sprinkled in some
decent drama, involving points of view, solid telegraphed performances from
its leads and an ending which surprisingly had me paying attention. Don't
get me wrong, you won't catch me running around trying to tell the world
about this film, but if you're into this kind of movie, like the actors, and
enjoy watching films which don't really offer any visible right or wrongs,
this might just be the trip for you. It's really more of a "video movie"
than anything else. In fact, despite being intrigued by everything which led
up to the ending, I felt kind of blah about the whole thing afterwards. Not
exactly sure why I felt that way, but I've deduced it down to the fact that
the film really didn't cover any fresh ground or the thing about the extra
salsa on my nachos.
Either way, the film does deliver a couple of riveting action sequences,
with the whole "fire at the demonstrators" scene topping that cake, a decent
pace, which doesn't bog itself down with too much legal mumbo-jumbo and an
interesting plot, in that it never really crucifies one person as the
proverbial "bad guy", thereby leaving the audience with the opportunity to
form their own opinions of Jackson's dilemma. Granted, Anne Archer looks
like a mess, Ben Kingsley is barely in the film and Guy Pearce does an
incredibly annoying/convincing Brooklyn accent, but aside from the staple
Jackson "screaming aloud" scenes, the gist of the film was quite convincing.
All in all, you won't find the word "original" in this review (doh!), but if
you're looking for a decent bi-polar story, a couple of good action scenes,
a generally compelling courtroom case and one goofy sequence featuring
Jackson/Jones duking it out as two old has-beens, than it might be just be
worth checking out for yourself. For me...it was an okay movie. That's it.
That's all. Next!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Tommy Lee Jones has never taken an acting class in his life and likes to
play polo.
Sam Jackson is also well-known for having played a lot of small roles in big
movies, earlier on his career. He played Eddie Murphy's "uncle" at the
beginning of his concert movie, RAW, was the "hold-up man" in Murphy's
COMING TO AMERICA, the "black guy" in Al Pacino's SEA OF LOVE, and "Stacks
Edwards" in Scorsese's GOODFELLAS.
Incidentally, despite the fact that this film presents us with final caption
cards with the fates of all its principal members, the film itself is not
based on actual facts by any means. Personally, I don't appreciate this type
of thing, find it sort of misleading and all, but there you have it...now
you know.
According to fellow online critic, James Berardinelli, former Secretary of
the U.S. Navy, James Webb, the man who is credited for having developed this
story, apparently asked that his name be removed from this film after a few
scenes in the final cut betrayed his original vision. Only after a few
changes were made, did Mr. Webb decide to rescind his request for  removal.
According to the IMDb, a complete replica of the Marine Corp Base at Camp
Lejeune, NC was built at the Vint Hill Farm Station, South Manassas, VA.
Upwards of 800 Marines were hired for the combat and other action scenes.

Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Guy Pearce,
Bruce Greenwood, Ben Kingsley and Philip Baker Hall
Director-William Friedkin
Canadian Rating-14A
Released by Paramount Pictures - 04/00
`Rules of Engagement' is not the standard Hollywood treatment for
glorification of patriotism in battle. When covering this ground, the
film achieves adequate success, and poses some interesting questions
surrounding the line that separates heroic bravery from cowardly murder.
However, the film is the standard Hollywood treatment of the aftermath
of this patriotism. A textbook courtroom drama plagued with irksome,
ho-hum plotting straight out of `A Few Good Men', it's quickly apparent
that `Rules of Engagement' is a shameless indulgence in the worst of
Hollywood dramatization. Hence, it's nothing new.
Momentum is achieved promptly by seasoned director William Friedkin
(`The French Connection'), who, despite some vapid implausibility's,
manages to stage some brutally realistic and effective battle sequences.
We open in 1968 during the Vietnam War, where marines Terry Childers
(Samuel L. Jackson) and Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) are engaged in
battle. When their platoon is separated, Childers winds up saving
Hodges' life in extreme and courageous circumstances. Cut to 28 years in
the future, where both men are now highly decorated colonels. Hodges is
retiring to fly-fishing in relaxing backwood trout streams, but Childers
continues his service, and is called into action for an operation in
Yemen that requires the rescue and retrieval of the American Ambassador
(Ben Kingsley) and his family. Due to extremely hostile rioting by
Yemeni civilians and high-perched snipers surrounding the embassy,
Childers loses three marines, while another lay critically wounded. He
orders an open-fire into the crowd, mowing down over 80 rioters
including women and children, in a disturbing sequence of images that
Friedkin once again directs with nimble expertise. When Childers is
court-martialed under the charges of murder and defiance of the standard
rules of engagement for battle, his position in the marine core and
future is at stake. He heads to Hodges and requests that he represent
him in court. `I'm a good enough lawyer to know you need a better lawyer
than me,' is the stern reply.
`Rules of Engagement' is a superbly structured military drama so far, a
top-drawer model with stellar performances filling any cracks in the
inconsistent foundation. And then Hollywood sneaks under the radar and
takes hold of a potentially gripping story-line. The villain, played by
Canadian Bruce Greenwood, is U.S. National Secuirity Advisor William
Sokal. A cowardly weasel determined to find a scapegoat at any cost,
Sokal destroys evidence of the rioters opening fire that would clear
Childers' name. Like virtually everything in the film, the role seems
cluttered and unfinished, although Greenwood plays Sokal with enough
panache for forgiveness. Similar exoneration cannot be granted for the
remainder of the choppy, uninvolving second half, which nose-dives into
courtroom formula and the standard offering of gaping plot holes.
Accepting Childers' position is initially difficult, because he have
reluctance to scrounge up much sympathy for a man who slaughtered 83
people... and many of them innocent civilians. Future plot movements
make this easier, but the actions of Jackson's character are too often
inconclusive. Jones is also subject to unconvincing characteristics.
While Hodges openly admits he is an inexperienced attorney, he still
acts in feeble-minded ways, snapping pictures with a camera that looks
like those waterproof Kodak models you purchase at the grocery store.
The star performances are one of the strong suits of `Rules of
Engagement'. Jones and Jackson whole-heartedly convince us of their
friendship and military background. Both have done far better work, but
their high-powered verbal exchanges ignite the screen - particularly in
a few tantalizing moments of courtroom confrontation that rise above the
rest of the mundane triviality. Another key factor in these scenes is
Australian Guy Pearce (`L.A. Confidential'), who fiddles around quite
successfully with a New York accent to play prosecuting attorney Biggs,
and adds more fuel to the fire. Mostly everything else in `Rules of
Engagement' fizzles quietly, like a bad batch of pop rocks. Philip Baker
Hall (as Hodges' father) and Blair Underwood (as a fellow testifying
marine) are both solid but perpetually under-used. All promise of a
stirring, pensive drama is plowed over by the transparent clichés of
Stephen Gaghan's screenplay. Large portions of the script appear to be
in shambles, perhaps the indication of material tampering that goes
right to the core.
Any messages about war violence and its posterior consequences are lost
in a haze of Hollywood formula. In `Rules of Engagement', you can't
overlook the stellar acting and direction, but the remainder of this
sloppy military drama will leave you in awkward state of ho-hum
indifference. Sacrificing moral issues and fascinating war themes for
tedious plotting and an inconclusive finale? Only in Hollywood, my
friends.
Your Comments Appreciated!  movieviews@hotmail.com
NEW at MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton --> The MOVIE STORE
http://Welcome.to/MovieViews

Author
Jonathan F Richards
     Back in the '70s, when Vietnam was raging and the Young Turks
were blazing a rebellious trail through Hollywood, a tyro auteur like
William Friedkin, with the mantle of European artistic sensibility
draped stylishly across his shoulders, would have cast a cold eye on a
job of work like "Rules of Engagement".  That was then, this is now.
     Still, a lot of this movie is pretty engaging, if you close your
eyes to a smattering of logic-stretchers and wince-makers.  Two Marine
colonels, Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) and Terry Childers (Samuel
L. Jackson), have been buddies since Vietnam, when Childers saved
Hodges's life.  Hodges sustained the leg wound that put him behind a
lawyer's desk for the rest of his Marine career while Childers went on
distinguishing himself in combat in the world's trouble zones.
     Then comes Yemen.  A protest outside the American embassy turns
ugly (we never quite know what it's about.)  Childers evacuates the
American ambassador (Ben Kingsley) and then, under withering attack
and with marines dropping like flies, orders his men to fire on the
crowd.  83 are killed, including a lot of women and children.  No
weapons are found among the dead, and a surveillance tape goes
missing.  Childers finds himself facing a court-martial.  Of course he
turns to his old buddy, who of course is retiring, and doesn't want
the responsibility ("I'm a good enough lawyer to know you need a
better lawyer than me.")
     What "Rules" would like to be about, and sometimes rises to, is a
moral ambiguity in which the boundaries between duty and excess,
defensible reaction and overkill, Guadalcanal and My Lai, good and
evil, are blurred.  The courtroom stuff is good, although the promised
mismatch between the self-described plodder Hodges and the brilliant
prosecutor (Guy Pearce) never materializes - Hodges holds his own
nicely.  But the story is generously ventillated with holes, and
characters do things that simply make no sense, and Friedkin grabs at
cliches like a contestant asking Regis for a lifeline.  It is revealed
that politicians are slimy and unprincipled, that men at arms forge
special bonds (even if they're on opposing sides), and that, as Pearce
points out, that "whether a man is charged with murder or hailed as a
hero is sometimes a very thin line.."
     The acting is of the high quality you'd expect from a cast that
includes Jones and Jackson and Kingsley and Anne Archer.  Pearce tries
on a Bronx accent, and wears it well.  Bruce Greenwood's villainy is
overdone, but the fault is with the filmmaker.  Whether a man is
hailed as a great director or pilloried as a hack is sometimes a very
thin line.  And sometimes not so thin.

Author
Jon Popick
I always get directors William Friedkin (The Exorcist) and John
Frankenheimer (The Manchurian Candidate) mixed up.  They were both at
the top of their game a few decades ago and spent most of the  90s
making first-rate but widely ignored television movies like 12 Angry Men
and George Wallace.  Friedkin helmed The French Connection and
Frankenheimer directed its sequel.  And six weeks after Frankenheimer's
mildly entertaining, big-budget bust Reindeer Games opened, Friedkin's
latest feature film hits the big screen.  And darned if Rules of
Engagement isn't a mildly entertaining, big-budget bust as well.
Rules begins in 1968 Viet Nam, where young Marines Hayes Hodges (Tommy
Lee Jones, Double Jeopardy) and Terry L. Childers (Samuel L. Jackson,
Deep Blue  Sea) slink through a booby-trapped jungle.  You may be
wondering how fifty-three-year-old Jones and fifty-one-year-old Jackson
were able to pull off young soldiers.  They don't  Jackson wears a
kerchief on his head, while Jones has a floppy hat pulled down over his
face and blood smeared over the giant cracks in it like crimson
spackle.  They could have dug up some younger look-a-likes.   Anyway,
Hodges takes one in the knee and Childers saves his life.  The scene is
filled with mud, water, bullets, red mist, gruesome wounds, and some
very Saving Private Ryan-esque camera work, editing and film speed.
Flash to 1996, where Hodges is retiring from the Corps and Childers has
just received orders to head up a special ops unit.  While he and his
men are aboard the U.S.S. Wake Island in the Indian Ocean, Childers gets
an assignment to rescue the U.S. Ambassador to Yemen (Ben Kingsley, What
Planet Are You From?) and his family from the embassy, which is
currently surrounded by hundreds of demonstrators that are growing more
and more violent.  Childers and his crew fly three choppers to the
embassy and rescue the Americans, despite drawing heavy fire from
snipers on the roofs of nearby buildings.
When several of his men are killed in action, Childers orders his troops
to open fire into the crowd of demonstrators, instead of just going
after the snipers.  Eighty-three die and over a hundred more are
seriously injured, including dozens of unarmed women and children.  The
worldwide public outcry in the aftermath of this shooting is too
deafening for the U.S. to ignore.  They need a scapegoat, immediately
labeling Childers as `a hotheaded miscalculation,' and subject the Major
to a court martial eight days later where he is charged with murder and
other assorted atrocities.
The film is really quite good through this point, at which Childers
hires Hodges to represent him, playing the `Gee, I did save your life'
card.  Rules then becomes a run-of-the-mill courtroom bore with one of
the most anti-climatic ending in recent memory.  Much of Childers' case
revolves around a missing videotape of the incident captured on an
embassy security camera that proves the demonstrators were firing on the
Marines, not just the snipers.  In real life, they would have determined
the origin of the gunfire from the holes in the front of the embassy,
but the promise of detailed forensic analysis doesn't usually bring 'em
out opening weekend.
There are a couple of bright spots in Rules, like some pretty nifty
shots shown through the eyes of the sniper during the embassy siege, and
a blistering, applause-inducing exchange on the stand between Childers
and prosecutor Major Mark Biggs (Guy Pearce, Ravenous), who sports a
wicked New Yawk accent (he's Australian).  There are no opening credits,
and the scenes set in Yemen (it's actually Morocco) look quite lovely.
Another interesting aspect to Rules is that there really aren't any bad
guys.  Biggs is just doing his job (he refuses to seek the death penalty
for Childers), and the National Security Advisor (Bruce Greenwood, Here
on Earth) and the Ambassador are only after Childers to protect the
interests of the country.
Rules was written by Stephen Gaghan (his first movie script), an
executive story editor on The Practice.  The film co-stars Anne Archer
(Clear & Present Danger), Blair Underwood (television's
soon-to-be-cancelled City of Angels), Philip Baker Hall (Magnolia) and
Nicky Katt (Boiler Room).
1:58 - R for graphic violence and adult language

Author
Ross Anthony
Deep in the thicket of the Vietnam War, anonymous bullets fly, ripping
through branches, streams, leaves, catching flesh as the digital frame
stutters bursting into red. This impressive, yet bloody sequence fixes the
history of Tommy Lee and Samuel L. as battle-bonded mates.
But it's a present day military action in Yemen that ties Samuel L. onto the
hot seat and Tommy in the extremely warm one just beside him. An unruly
crowd outside the US embassy prompts the passage of three choppers full of
Sam and his men to "baby-sit" on foreign turf. But when the poop hits the
fan, Sam risks life and limb to evacuate the ambassador and his family. At
the end of the day the streets are bloodied with dead women and children and
Sam stands alone at the end of the national security adviser's pointed
finger.
A military court-martial trial comprises the rest of the film. Samuel relies
on old buddy Tommy Lee to defend him against one of the militaries finest
prosecutors, Guy Pearce. Pierce is fierce, a bony Chihuahua with a New York
accent (though he's surprisingly a British born Aussie). Tommy reluctantly
takes on the case, and finding no strong leg to stand on, becomes
disillusioned concerning his best bud's innocence. I love this development.
We too, begin to doubt Jackson. But just as the tension mounts, bam, we (the
audience) are presented with a two-minute scene that spills the beans
concerning Sam's guilt/innocence. Why? No longer can we enjoy the delicately
difficult position Tommy Lee must endure, because though he is not privy to
our intelligence - somehow he seems to have resolved his internal conflict
along with us.
Still, Jones and Jackson are so rock hard, that it's impossible not to be
compelled to the proceedings. Recognition is due also, to the excellent
audio mixing. The sound on this film "Rules!" Unfortunately, the climax
comes and goes with less impact than nearly every other scene proceeding.
"Rules" picks up and turns around the "Few Good Men" story, putting Tommy
Lee in the position of defending the Jack Nicholson argument. In the end,
"Rules of Engagement," though shrapnel-ridden and faulted, still stands
proud.
(I ran into a couple of real live US Marines after the screening. FYI, They
were pleased with the film's portrayal of the military.)
Rules of Engagement. Copyright Š 2000. Rated R.
Starring Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L Jackson, Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Bruce
Greenwood, Anne Archer, Blair Underwood, Philip Baker Hall, and Dale Dye.
Directed by William Friedkin.
Written by Stephen Gaghan.
Produced by Richard D. Zanuck, Scott Rudin at Paramount/Seven Arts.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 2000. Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Alex Ioshpe
DIRECTED BY: William Friedkin
WRITTEN BY: James Webb and Stephen Gaghan
CAST: Samuel L. Jackson, Ben Kingsley, Tommy Lee Jones, Guy Pearce
MPAA: Rated R for scenes of war violence, and for language.
Runtime: USA:128
As we see the terrible events that unfold before our eyes in the
Middle East at the moment, Hollywood doesn't loose the oppertunity to
get involved, by telling stories and expressing opinions.
This film centers on a relationship forged throughout the adult
lifetimes of two Marine colonels, Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) and
Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson). They fought side by side in
Vietnam, where Childers saved Hodges' life by shooting an unarmed
POW. That's against the rules of war but understandable, in this story
anyway, under the specific circumstances. Certainly Hodges is not
complaining. Years pass. Hodges, whose wounds make him unfit for
action, gets a law degree and becomes a Marine lawyer. Childers, is
now a respected and much-decorated hero that has served his country
with his life and sould. Because of his excellent record, Childers is
sent to Yemen to rescue the American ambassador (Ben Kingsley),
cowering in the embassy under assault from violent demonstrators and
snipers blasting from rooftops. Childers does what he has to do:
evacuate the family and protect the men under his command. After three
Marines die and the colonel thinks he sees ground fire, he orders his
troops to shoot into the firing crowd. More than 80 Yemeni men, women,
and children are mowed down. Childers is immediately accused of
ordering his men to fire on a crowd and murder of unarmed
civilians. He persuades his old friend Hodges to represent him in the
courtroom drama that occupies the second half of the film. Did
Childers violate authorized U.S. military rules of engagement? Or are
there simply no rules in war?
The answers to these stereotypical questions are obvious, but the
inconsistent plot immediately raises all sorts of other questions. The
murder of 83 "innocent civilians" has to result into something greater
than a simple trial in the U.S. Where is the accusations from the Arab
leaders? Where is the U.N.? The film ends without even telling the
most interesting story: what happens on the international arena?
This film (in a way akin to films such as "A Few Good Men") has
already been accused of breaking the rules of morality and ethics and
even of racism. These accusations are pretty heavy, but also
unfair. What director William Friedklin truly broke was the rules of
decent filmmaking. One of the earliest apparent problems with 'Rules
of Engagement' is its lack of credibility. The entire operation in
Yemen may remind us about what happens in the Middle East right now,
but is overdone, contrived and unrealistic - as if a chain of events
had to happen in a particular manner in order for the plot to
proceed. A lot of it is so cheesy that no one could possibly accept it
as reality. That is precisely why it's not offensive. It is completely
unobjective. Many stories are started and never finished. Many
questions are asked, but never answered. A lot of parallels are
referring to nothing. It seems that neither the director, producers or
the screenwriter can make up their minds about the contents of their
film. Is it about Arab mentality? America's foreign policies?
America's role in the world? Corruption in the higher circles? It goes
on and on. It consists of countless stories, but not a definable
plot. It tries to be everything for everyone and ends up being nothing
for no one.
I think that it is ironic, because director William Friedkin's
probably most acclaimed film was "The Exorcist" which had a silly
story, but became a rather effective film. In this case you have a
strong story with many possibilities and the result is a silly
film. Though several scenes bare the mark of professionalism (such as
the impressive battle scenes), his latest film does simply not
engage. I believe that Friedklin is a director that is absolutely
depended on great scripts and talented producers in order to
succeed. It's obvious that he has neither and the result is therefore
a catastrophe. The characters feel designed, unreal, merely shadows,
with no life outside the conflict. Even the actors can not save this
film from going under. Though both Jackson and Jones act admirably,
with performances that are as good as you get with a script like this,
it is not something that these great actors can boast of. They have
roles that they could play blindfolded with their hand on the
back. Jackson is gray and Jones uninteresting. The rest of the cast,
including Ben Kingsly, Blair Underwood and Guy Pearce are simply
waiting for their paychecks.
The time has come for the verdict. On the charges of complete lack of
objectivity, I find this film guilty. On the charges of breaking the
rules of reasonable filmmaking, I find it guilty. But on the charges
of racism I find this film not guilty, because of it's inconclusive
and often silly plot that lacks objectivity everywhere, not only when
concerning the Arab population. I must admit that the film is
dangerously near the line of being racially offensive and I do think
that screenwriter Stephen Gaghan went a bit too far, portraying the
Yemeni people almost as stereotypical Hollywood bad-guys. This is very
sad, since in a time like this it is crucial to not lose objectivity
and proclaim the truth. However, it is absolutely necessary to
remember that the Muslim terrorists are responsible for most of the
terrorist activity in and outside the United States. And that it's not
a coincidence that U.S. residents in the Middle East, including Yemen
are on constant maximum alert.
